Montana, session 2025, SB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Confidentiality -- disclosure exceptions. (1) The office of the child and family
ombudsman shall treat all matters under investigation as confidential. Information received, collected, and
maintained by the office of the child and family ombudsman may not be disclosed or disseminated except as
provided by this part.
(2) (a) Records of the office of the child and family ombudsman may be disclosed to a court for in
camera inspection if relevant to an issue before the court. Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), the court
may permit disclosure in a proceeding if the court finds disclosure to be necessary for the fair resolution of an
issue.
(b) Except as provided in 41-3-1214, the identity of a person that contacts or files a request for
assistance from the ombudsman is confidential.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
41, chapter 3, part 12, and the provisions of Title 41, chapter 3, part 12, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 251
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 251, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 251
INTRODUCED BY D. LENZ
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE OFFICE OF THE CHILD AND FAMILY
OMBUDSMAN; PROVIDING THAT MATTERS UNDER INVESTIGATION ARE CONFIDENTIAL; AND
PROVIDING DISCLOSURE EXCEPTIONS.”